Massachusetts, session 194th, S1760.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 94B of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended in subsection 1 in line 14 by inserting after the words "military
reservation fire department" the following:- "members of municipal police departments who
perform arson investigations."
of 1